Maryland, session 2025, SB0210.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
4–312.
(a) (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 3, § 20 and Section 4, § 16 of
Chapter 608 of the Acts of the General Assembly of 1976, tolls may continue to be charged
on the John F. Kennedy Memorial Highway and any project constructed under the
provisions of Section 3 (Bridge, Tunnel, and Motorway Revenue Bonds) of Chapter 608 of
the Acts of the General Assembly of 1976.
(2) As to all or any part of any transportation facilities project, the
Authority may:
(i) Fix, revise, charge, and collect rentals, rates, fees, tolls, and other
charges and revenues for its use or for its services; and
(ii) Contract with any person who desires its use for any purpose and
fix the terms, conditions, rentals, rates, fees, tolls, or other charges or revenues for this use.
(3) (i) Before the Authority adopts an increase in tolls, fees, or other
charges on any part of a fixed toll transportation facilities project or adopts an increase in
mileage rate ranges, pricing periods, toll zones, fees, or other charges on a variably priced
toll transportation facilities project, the Authority shall provide an opportunity for public
– 1 –

Ch. 56 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
review and comment on the proposed increase at one or more meetings held at a time and
place of convenience to the public in each county in which the increase is proposed to be
implemented.
(ii) At least 10 working days before the start of the first meeting
under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, the Authority shall provide to the public on the
Authority’s official website the proposed increase in tolls, fees, mileage rate ranges, pricing
periods, toll zones, or other charges and information and studies used in its analysis to
justify the proposed increase.
(iii) For a period of at least 10 working days after the last scheduled
meeting for public review and comment under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, the
Authority shall provide the public with an opportunity to submit additional written
comments on the proposal.
(iv) Within 10 days after the close of the written comment period
under subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, the Authority shall provide to the public on its
official website and to the members of the Authority a summary and analysis of the
comments received from the public on the proposal.
(4) Before the Authority votes on any proposal to increase tolls, fees, or
other charges on any part of a fixed toll transportation facilities project or votes on an
increase in mileage rate ranges, pricing periods, toll zones, fees, or other charges on any
part of a variably priced toll transportation facilities project, the Authority shall:
(i) Provide in writing to all of the members of the Authority and, on
request, to the public any recommendation of the Authority regarding the proposal;
(ii) For a period of at least 10 working days after making any
recommendation on the proposal, provide an opportunity for public review and written
comment on the recommendation;
(iii) Provide to the public on its official website:
1. Any recommendation of the Authority regarding the
proposal; and
2. The time, place, and date of the meeting at which the
Authority will vote on the proposal; and
(iv) Provide to each member of the Authority and provide to the
public on its official website a summary and analysis of any public comments received
under item (ii) of this paragraph by the Authority regarding the Authority’s
recommendation.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 56
(5) (i) At any meeting in which a recommendation to increase tolls, fees,
or other charges on a fixed toll transportation facilities project or a recommendation to
increase mileage rate ranges, pricing periods, toll zones, fees, or other charges on a variably
priced transportation facilities project is scheduled for consideration, the Authority shall
provide the public a reasonable amount of time to comment on the recommendation before
the Authority votes on the recommendation.
(ii) If the Authority amends its recommendation after receiving
public comment at the meeting under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph and then votes on
the amended recommendation at that meeting, the Authority is not required to provide an
additional opportunity for public comment under paragraph (4) of this subsection.
(6) (i) If the Authority determines that it must increase tolls, fees,
mileage rate ranges, pricing periods, toll zones, or other charges within a time period or in
a manner that will not permit compliance with paragraphs (3) and (4) of this subsection to
remain in compliance with the provisions of any trust agreement, escrow deposit
agreement, or resolution that provides for the payment of bonds issued by the Authority,
or to ensure that unforeseen circumstances do not adversely affect the continuity of
operations at one or more transportation facilities projects, the Authority shall determine
that an emergency status exists.
(ii) If the Authority determines that an emergency status exists
under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, the Authority shall adopt temporary adjustments
to tolls, fees, mileage rate ranges, pricing periods, toll zones, or other charges that shall
take effect immediately on adoption by the Authority or on the effective date established
by the Authority.
(iii) If the Authority adopts any temporary adjustments to tolls, fees,
mileage rate ranges, pricing periods, toll zones, or other charges under subparagraph (ii) of
this paragraph, the Authority shall:
1. Provide notice to the public on the Authority’s official
website of any temporary adjustment adopted under subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph;
and
2. Commence the public notice and comment procedures
under paragraphs (3) and (4) of this subsection immediately.
(iv) An emergency status determination may not exceed [180] 300
days and may be subject to one or more additional conditions imposed by the Authority.
(v) When the emergency status expires, the temporary adjustments
adopted under subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph shall end.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
– 3 –

Ch. 56 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Approved by the Governor, April 8, 2025.
– 4 –